Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2775.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change A. The chapter heading of title 1, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "governmental maintenance operations and capital projects" to "government operations and resources". B. The article heading of title 1, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "GENERAL PROVISIONS" to "governmental maintenance operations and capital projects". Sec. 2. Title 1, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2, to read: ARTICLE 2. GOVERNMENT RESOURCES START_STATUTE1-821. Prohibited use of government resources; international organizations; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law and except as required by a court order, an agency of this state, a political subdivision of this state or an employee of an agency or political subdivision of this state acting in the employee's official capacity may not do any of the following: 1. Knowingly and wilfully participate in any way in the Enforcement or implementation of any rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy or mandate of any kind of an international Organization. 2. Use any assets, state monies or monies allocated by this state to political subdivisions of this state on or after the effective date of this section, in whole or in part, to engage in any activity that aids an international Organization in enforcing or implementing any rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy or mandate of any kind in this state. B. For the purposes of this section, "international organization" includes all of the following: 1. The world health organization. 2. The United Nations and any United Nations agency. 3. The world economic forum. 4. The bank for international settlements. 5. The international criminal court. 6. The international monetary fund. 7. The North Atlantic Treaty Organization. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 15, chapter 13, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-1650.07, to read: START_STATUTE15-1650.07. Foreign adversary monies, support and collaboration; higher educational institutions; prohibition; review; university reporting requirements A. Notwithstanding any other law, a public institution of higher education in this state, including any university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona Board of Regents, may not knowingly solicit, accept, enter into or continue any loan, gift, grant, contract, agreement, research partnership, memorandum of understanding or sponsored project that originates from, is funded by or is affiliated with any of the following entities: 1. The government of the People's Republic of China. 2. The Chinese Communist Party. 3. Any political subdivision, instrumentality, state-owned enterprise, military-affiliated entity or agent acting on behalf of the People's Republic of China or the Chinese Communist Party. 4. Beihang University, formerly known as Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics. 5. Beijing Institute of Technology. 6. Harbin Engineering University. 7. Harbin Institute of Technology. 8. Nanjing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics. 9. Nanjing University of Science and Technology. 10. Northwestern Polytechnical University. B. Any proposed acceptance of monies, support or collaboration with an entity listed in subsection A of this section must be submitted to the Arizona Board of Regents for review and written approval before the ACCEPTANCE of monies, support or collaboration may occur. The Arizona Board of Regents is the sole reviewing and decision-making authority for determining whether the acceptance of any monies, support or collaboration is consistent with the laws of this state, national security interests and the public interest of this state. C. A public institution of higher education may not delegate, bypass or presume approval authority as prescribed in this section, and any agreement entered into or executed without prior approval by the Arizona Board of Regents is void and unenforceable as a matter of law. D. If the Arizona Board of Regents approves the acceptance of monies or an agreement pursuant to this section and the acceptance is later determined to not comply with this section, the public institution of higher education shall FORFEIT an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent of the total value of the monies, grant, loan, gift or agreement. The forfeited amount shall be paid from the institution's general operating budget to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund. The legislature may not increase or decrease an appropriation to the institution to offset the forfeiture. E. The Arizona Board of Regents shall establish a subcommittee, advisory board or similar entity to REVIEW and approve, if appropriate pursuant to subsection B of this section, any proposed monies, support or collaboration between a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents and an entity that is listed in subsection A of this section.  The Arizona board of regents shall adopt reporting requirements for universities that are under the jurisdiction of the arizona board of regents regarding any monies, support or collaboration that is approved pursuant to this section. the reporting requirements must ensure that any report under this subsection comply with basic accounting guidelines as prescribed by the Auditor General. Reports under this subsection may be inspected by the Auditor General.END_STATUTE